Utah statutes.
32B-8-301.   Commission's power to issue resort spa sublicense.

(1)  Before a person may store, sell, offer for sale, furnish, or allow the consumption of an alcoholic product on its premises as a resort spa sublicensee, a resort licensee or a person applying for a resort license shall first obtain a resort spa sublicense from the commission in accordance with this part.

(2)  The commission may issue a resort spa sublicense to establish a resort spa license within the boundary of a resort building for the storage, sale, offer for sale, furnishing, and consumption of liquor on premises operated as a resort spa.

(3)  The resort spa sublicense premises shall fall entirely within the boundary of a resort building.

